North Carolina, session 2025, HB643.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 14-315.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-315.1. Storage of firearms to protect minors.
(a) Any person who resides in the same premises as a minor, owns or possesses a firearm,
and stores or leaves the firearm (i) in a condition that the firearm can be discharged and (ii) in a
manner that the person knew or should have known that an unsupervised minor would be able to
gain access to the firearm, is guilty of a Class 1 A1 misdemeanor if a minor gains access to the
firearm without the lawful permission of the minor's parents or a person having charge of the
minor and the minor:minor does any of the following:
(1) Possesses it in violation of G.S. 14-269.2(b);G.S. 14-269.2(b).
(2) Exhibits it in a public place in a careless, angry, or threatening
manner;manner.
(3) Causes personal injury or death with it not in self defense; ordefense.
(4) Uses it in the commission of a crime.
…."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
*H643-v-1*